Washington statutes.
RCW 11.135.120

Admissibility.

Evidence relating to an electronic nontestamentary estate planning document or an electronic signature on the document may not be excluded in a proceeding solely because such evidence is in electronic form.

[ 2024 c 188 s 13.]